Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1410
Witness; oath or affirmation; administration.

Before any witness shall be examined by the grand jury, an oath or affirmation shall be administered to him by the clerk truly to testify of such matters and things as may be lawfully inquired of before the jury, a certificate whereof the clerk shall make and deliver to such witness, who shall present the same to the foreman of the grand jury when he is admitted for examination.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 401, p. 815;

R.S.1913, § 9040;

C.S.1922, § 10064;

C.S.1929, § 29-1410;

R.S.1943, § 29-1410.

Oath of secrecy of grand jury deliberations is not prohibited. State v. Abboud, 181 Neb. 84, 147 N.W.2d 152 (1966).